Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 5
CARBON SEQUESTRATION REGISTRY

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, Code Sections 12-6-220 through 12-6-232, as enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 354,

§

1, were redesignated as Code Sections 12-6-240 through 12-6-247.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2004, p. 343,

§

5, provides that the enactment of this article becomes effective only upon the effective date of a specific appropriation of funds for purposes of that Act as expressed in a line item of an appropriations Act enacted by the General Assembly. Funds were appropriated at the 2006 session of the General Assembly.

12-6-220. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Carbon Sequestration Registry Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-6-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-221. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Carbon sequestration results" means the participant's applicable data on the removal of carbon dioxide from the atmosphere by sinks resulting from:

Direct human-induced land use change or forestry activities in this state;

Additional human-induced activities in this state related to removal by sinks in land use change and forestry categories;

Additional human-induced activities in this state related to removal by sinks in agricultural soils;

Additional human-induced activities in this state related to removals by sinks in products in use from harvested timber or agricultural crops; and

Other human-induced activities in this state related to removals by sinks.

"Certification" means the determination of whether a given participant's carbon sequestration result has met a minimum quality standard and complied with an appropriate set of approved procedures and protocols for submitting carbon sequestration information.

"Commission" means the State Forestry Commission.

"Director" means the director of the State Forestry Commission.

"Forest" means lands that support, or can support, at least 10 percent tree canopy cover and that allow for management of one or more forest resources including but not limited to timber, fish and wildlife, biodiversity, water quality, air quality, soil conservation, recreation, aesthetics, or other benefits.

"Greenhouse gases" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.

"Native forest" means a forest type, natural or artificially regenerated, composed of any one or more tree species identified as native to this state in G. Norman Bishop, Native Trees of Georgia (Georgia Forestry Commission 2000 revised edition), including without limitation improved stock of such tree species developed through breeding programs.

"Participant" or "registry participant" means a registrant of carbon sequestration results with the registry.

"Registry" means the Georgia Carbon Sequestration Registry provided for by this article.

"Sink" means an ecosystem or crop or product thereof that absorbs or has absorbed carbon, thereby removing it from the atmosphere and offsetting emissions of carbon dioxide.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-222. Establishment of Carbon Sequestration Registry; uniform automated electronic information system.

The commission shall establish a Georgia Carbon Sequestration Registry, which shall be in operation not later than one year after the effective date of this article.

The commission may contract with the Georgia Superior Court Clerks' Cooperative Authority to develop and implement a state-wide uniform automated electronic information system for purposes of the registry.

After its establishment, the state-wide uniform automated electronic information system for purposes of the registry shall be maintained by the Georgia Superior Court Clerks' Cooperative Authority or its designated agent in accordance with Code Section

15-6-97.2

.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Role of Georgia Superior Court Clerks' Cooperative Authority in uniform automated electronic information system,

§

15-6-97.2

.

12-6-223. Purpose of registry.

The purpose of the Georgia Carbon Sequestration Registry shall be to do all of the following:

Encourage voluntary actions to reduce greenhouse gas emissions;

Enable participants to voluntarily record carbon sequestrations made after January 1, 1990, or such other beginning date as may be established by rule or regulation of the commission, in a consistent format that is certified;

Ensure that sources in the state receive appropriate consideration for certified carbon sequestration results under any future federal or international regulatory regime relating to greenhouse gas emissions;

Recognize, publicize, and promote participants in the registry; and

Recruit broad participation in the process from all economic sectors and regions of the state.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-223

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-224. Role of the commission.

For purposes of the registry, the commission shall:

Adopt rules or regulations specifying acceptable types of carbon sequestration results consistent with paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-6-221 and this paragraph and providing procedures and protocols for the monitoring, estimating, calculating, reporting, and certification of carbon sequestration results for purposes of participation in the registry.

Procedures and protocols relative to forestry activities that are reported as a participant's carbon sequestration results under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-6-221 shall require, at a minimum, that those forestry activities meet the following criteria in order to be reported as any part of a participant's carbon sequestration results:

Forestry activities shall be based on forest management practices within a defined project area that meet or exceed Georgia's Best Management Practices for Forestry as published by the commission and that are not the subject of any ongoing remediation or penalty pursuant to judicial or administrative judgment or order for violation of any applicable requirements of federal, state, or local land use laws, regulations, or ordinances. Best management practices and federal, state, or local land use laws, regulations, or ordinances shall be those in effect each time a participant registers a defined project area in the registry;

Forestry activities reported as carbon sequestration results shall reflect the amount of time that net carbon gains are stored; and

Forestry activities shall maintain and promote native forests.

Procedures and protocols relative to sinks in agricultural soils that are reported as a participant's carbon sequestration results under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-6-221 shall be adopted by the commission in accordance with the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture.

The commission shall consider the availability and suitability of simplified techniques and tools when adopting procedures and protocols for the certification of carbon sequestration results.

The procedures and protocols adopted by the commission shall include a uniform format for reporting carbon sequestration results to facilitate their recognition in any future regulatory regime;

Qualify third-party organizations that have the capability to certify reported baseline carbon sequestration results and that are capable of certifying the participant reported results as provided in this article; and

Encourage organizations and individuals from various sectors of the state's economy, and those from various geographic regions of the state, to report carbon sequestration results.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-224

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942.)

12-6-225. Procedures and protocols.

The procedures and protocols for monitoring, estimating, calculating, reporting, and certifying carbon sequestration results established by, or approved pursuant to, this article shall be the only procedures and protocols recognized by the state for the purposes of the registry as described in Code Section 12-6-223.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-225

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-226. Procedures and protocols are not condition for ongoing use of forest land.

Procedures and protocols adopted pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-6-224 shall not be interpreted or construed as a condition for any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for an ongoing use of forest land.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-226

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-227. Voluntary participation; right of withdrawal.

Participation in the registry shall be voluntary, and participants may withdraw at any time.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-227

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-228. Reporting of results; basic unit of participation in registry; filing of reports.

Participants shall initially report their certified carbon sequestration results for the most recent year for which they have complete data as specified in this article. Participants that have complete data for earlier years that can be certified may establish their baseline as any year beginning on or after January 1, 1990, or such other beginning date as may be established by rule or regulation of the commission. After establishing baseline results, participants shall report their certified carbon sequestration results in each subsequent year in order to show changes with respect to their baseline year. Participants may report carbon sequestration results without establishing a baseline for such results or for emissions. Certified carbon sequestration results reported to the registry by a participant shall be credited in carbon mass units to an account established for the participant in the registry.

Registry credits for certified carbon sequestration results may be sold, purchased, or otherwise transferred in whole or in part without any regard to or effect on or being affected by ownership of other personal property or any real property, and such credits may be retained in whole or in part without any regard to or effect on or being affected by any sale, purchase, or other transfer of other personal property or any real property.

In addition to annual reports submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, participants shall report to the registry any sales, purchases, or other transfers of registry credits for certified carbon sequestration results, in whole or in part, within ten days after the completion of such transaction, and participants' registry accounts shall be updated to reflect such transfers.

The basic unit of participation in the registry shall be a natural person or a legal entity in its entirety such as a corporation or other legally constituted body, a city or county, or a state government agency.

Reports to the registry by participants may be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county of this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-228

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-229. Adoption of standardized forms.

To support the estimation, calculation, reporting, and certification of carbon sequestration results in a consistent format, the commission, in consultation with the Georgia Superior Court Clerks' Cooperative Authority, shall adopt standardized forms that all participants shall use to calculate, report, and certify emissions results.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-229

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Role of Georgia Superior Court Clerks' Cooperative Authority in uniform automated electronic information system,

§

15-6-97.2

.

12-6-230. Certification of methodologies and results; approval of competent third-party organizations for certifying results; requirements of organizations; review, evaluation and reporting to Governor.

Participants registering baseline carbon sequestration results in the registry shall provide certification of their methodologies and results. The commission may, upon recommendation of the director, following a public process, adopt simplified procedures to certify carbon sequestration results as appropriate. Participants shall follow commission approved procedures and protocols in determining carbon sequestration results and supply the quantity and quality of information necessary to allow an independent ex post certification of the baseline results reported under this program.

The commission shall provide a list of approved third-party organizations recognized as competent to certify carbon sequestration results as provided in this article. The commission shall reopen the qualification process periodically in order for new organizations to be added to the approved list.

Where required for certification, organizations approved pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall do all of the following:

Evaluate whether the participant has a program, consistent with commission approved procedures and protocols, in place for preparation and submittal of the information reported under this article;

Check, during certification, the reasonableness of the carbon sequestration information being reported for a random sample of estimates or calculations; and

Summarize its review in a report to the board of directors, or equivalent governing body, of the participating legal entity or to the participating natural person, attesting to the existence of a program that is consistent with commission approved procedures and protocols and the reasonableness of the reported carbon sequestration results and noting any exceptions, omissions, limitations, or other qualifications to their representations.

In conducting certification for a participant under this program, the approved organization shall schedule any meeting or meetings with the participant with a minimum of one week's notice at one or more representative locations and allow the participant to control property access. The meetings shall be conducted in accordance with a protocol that is agreed upon in advance by the participant and the approved organization. The approved organization shall not perform property inspection, direct measurement, monitoring, or testing unless authorized by the participant.

To ensure the integrity and constant improvement of the registry program, the commission shall perform on a random basis an occasional review and evaluation of participants' carbon sequestration reporting, certifications, and the reasonableness of the information being reported for analysis of estimates or calculations. The director shall report any findings in writing. The director shall include a summary of these findings in the biennial report to the Governor and the General Assembly required by Code Section

12-6-231

.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-230

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942.)

12-6-231. Reporting to Governor by director.

Not later than two years after the effective date of this article and biennially thereafter, the director shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the number of participants in the registry, the amounts of carbon sequestered by those participants, and ways to make the registry more workable for participants that are consistent with the goals and intent of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-231

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1.)

12-6-232. Obligation of commission.

The commission shall do all of the following:

Develop a process for qualifying third-party organizations recognized by the state as competent to certify the carbon sequestration results of the types of natural persons or legal entities that may choose to participate in this registry, by doing all of the following:

Developing a list of the minimum technical and organizational capabilities and other qualification standards that approved third-party organizations shall meet. Those qualifications shall include the ability to sign an opinion letter, for which they may be held financially at risk, and certifying the participant-reported carbon sequestration results as provided in this article. Such capabilities and standards for third-party organizations related to certification of carbon sequestration results achieved by sinks in agricultural soils under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-6-221 shall be adopted by the commission in accordance with the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture;

Publicizing an applications process or otherwise encouraging interested organizations to submit their qualifications for review;

Evaluating applicant organizations according to the list of qualifications described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Determining specific third-party organizations as qualified to certify participants' actual carbon sequestration results in accordance with this article; and

Periodically updating the list of approved third-party organizations by doing any of the following:

Reviewing the capabilities of approved organizations;

Reviewing applications of organizations seeking to become approved; and

Determining specific organizations to be added to the approved list and specific organizations no longer qualified to perform the duties of this article;

Occasionally, and on a random basis, provide for commission employees to accompany third-party organizations on scheduled visits to observe and evaluate, during any certification visit, both the following:

Whether the participant has a program, consistent with commission approved procedures and protocols, in place for the preparation and submittal of the information required under this article; and

The reasonableness of the carbon sequestration information being reported for a sample of estimates or calculations; and

Review future international or federal programs related to greenhouse gas emissions and make reasonable efforts to promote consistency between the state program and these programs and to reduce the reporting burden on participants.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-232

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 343, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942.)